src/morphology/yrk-all.lexc
LEXICON POSSESSA-PL-ABL
+Pl+Abl+PxSg1:%>х%{ауоэØ%}тан   K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg1:%>х%{ауоэØ%}тани   K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg2:%>х%{ауоэØ%}тат   K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg3:%>х%{ауоэØ%}тата  K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxDu1:%>х%{ауоэØ%}таниʼ K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxDu2:%>х%{ауоэØ%}татиʼ K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxDu3:%>х%{ауоэØ%}татиʼ K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxPl1:%>х%{ауоэØ%}танаˮ K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxPl2:%>х%{ауоэØ%}татаˮ K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxPl3:%>х%{ауоэØ%}татоʼ K ;

LEXICON POSSESSA-PL-PROS
+Pl+Pros+PxSg1:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2нан   K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg2:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2нат   K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg3:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2ната  K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu1:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2наниʼ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu2:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2натиʼ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu3:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2натиʼ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl1:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2нанаˮ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl2:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2натаˮ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl3:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2натоʼ K ;

LEXICON POSSESSA-PL-PROS_ˮмана
!!+Pl+Pros:ˮмана
+Pl+Pros+PxSg1:ˮмана%>н   K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg2:ˮмана%>т   K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg3:ˮмана%>та  K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu1:ˮмана%>ниʼ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu2:ˮмана%>тиʼ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu3:ˮмана%>тиʼ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl1:ˮмана%>наˮ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl2:ˮмана%>таˮ K ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl3:ˮмана%>тоʼ K ;





!! Conjugation of nouns and adjectives
LEXICON NOMINAL-CONJUGATION
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1:%>дмʼ K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1:%>мʼ K ; !хомʼ
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2:%>н   K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3:      K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1:%>ниʼ K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2:%>диʼ K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1:%>ваˮ K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2:%>даˮ K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%>ˮ   K ;

+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:%>дамзь K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:%>манзь K ; !хоманзь
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2:%>нась  K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:%>сь    K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1:%>нинзь K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2:%>динзь K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3:%>х%{ауоэØ%}нзь K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1:%>ваць  K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2:%>даць  K ;
+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%>ць    K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Pronoun inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nenets pronouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON PRON_
+TYÄ+Pron: # ;

LEXICON PersSg1
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersSg2
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersSg3
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersDu1
+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersDu2
+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersDu3
+Pron+Pers+Du3+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersPl1
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersPl2
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersPl3
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: # ;

LEXICON PersSg1-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersSg2-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersSg3-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersDu1-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersDu2-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Du2+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersDu3-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Du3+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersPl1-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersPl2-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PersPl3-CxAcc
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ADN_
+Pron+Dem: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-HUM_
+Pron+Interr+Hum:  SG-NOM-STEM ;
+Pron+Interr+Hum:  SG-ACC-STEM ;
+Pron+Interr+Hum:  SGDATSUF ;
+Pron+Interr+Hum:  PLNOMSUF ;
+Pron+Interr+Hum:%^A2I PLACCSUF_Zero ;
+Pron+Interr+Hum:  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_
+Pron+Interr: NMN_ӇАВО ;

LEXICON PRON_ЕД
+Pron: NMN_ЕД ;

LEXICON PRON_ӇУДИ
+Pron: NMN_ӇУДИ ;
+Pron+Lim:ри NMN_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON PRON_ТИКЫ
+Pron: NMN_ПАНЫ ;

LEXICON PRON_ПИСЬ
+Pron: NMN_ПИСЬ ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ADN_ТИКЫ
+Pron: NMN_ПАНЫ ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-TEMP_
+Pron+Interr+Temp: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-QNT_
+Pron+Interr+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-MANNER_
+Pron+Interr+Manner: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_ӇУДИ
+Pron+Interr+A: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_-CXABL
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Abl: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_-CXLAT
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Lat: # ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_-CXLOC
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Loc: # ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT_-CXLOC
+Adv+Spat+Loc: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! Nenets proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a XXX as separator.

LEXICON PROP_
+TYÄ+N+Prop: K ; ! This will need to be elaborated to other noun types.

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE CONSONANT-FINAL STEM
LEXICON PROP_ЕД
+N+Prop: NMN_ЕД ;

!! !THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM
LEXICON PROP_МАРАӇГЫ
+N+Prop: NMN_МАРАӇГЫ ;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP_ ;
:%: PROP_ ;
:%- PROP_ ;
:%' PROP_ ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Quantifier inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nenets quantifiers ...

LEXICON NUM_МЯДО
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_МЯДО ;

LEXICON NUM_ВАР
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ВАР ;

LEXICON NUM_ӇУДИ
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇУДИ ;

LEXICON NUM_ӇОДИ
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇОДИ ;

LEXICON NUM_ТАРЕ
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON NUM_ЕД !!= @CODE@ ед: 13 
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД ;

LEXICON NUM_ЕД/ТИРЕ
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД/ТИРЕ ;

LEXICON NUM_ЕД/ХАНО
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД/ХАНО ;

LEXICON NUM_ӇОДИ/ТЁН
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: N_ӇОДИ/ТЁН ;

LEXICON NUM_ТИРЕ/ХАНО
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ТИРЕ/ХАНО ;

LEXICON NUM_ХУСУВЭЙ
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ ;

LEXICON QNT_ХУСУВЭЙ
+Qnt+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN+N: NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ ;

!! we need to get away from these: NUM_VOW and NUM_CONS
!! it's done
!!LEXICON NUM_VOW
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_Vow ;
!!
!!LEXICON NUM_CONS
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_Cons ;
!!
!!LEXICON NUM_D
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: NMN_МЯДО ;
!!
!!LEXICON NUM_N
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_ТЭНО ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nenets verbs inflect in persons.

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_Е !!= @CODE@ есь:е
+V+IV: V-01_Е ;

LEXICON IV_МЭ
+V+IV: V-01_МЭ       ;

LEXICON TV_МЭ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МЭ       ;

LEXICON IV_МЫ
+V+IV: V-01_МЫ       ;

LEXICON TV_МЫ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МЫ       ;

LEXICON VA_НЁ
+V+Aux: V-01_НЁ       ;

LEXICON VA_НИ
+V+Aux: V-01_НИ       ;

LEXICON IV_НИ
+V+IV: V-01_НИ       ;

LEXICON IV_НО
+V+IV: V-01_НО       ;

LEXICON IV_НУ
+V+IV: V-01_НУ       ;

LEXICON IV_НУ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_НУ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_НУ
+V+Refl: V-01_НУ-REFL       ;

LEXICON VR_НУ-Pal/Var
+V+Refl: V-01_НУ-REFL       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_НУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НУ       ;

LEXICON TV_НУ-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НУ       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_НУ/ТУ
+V+IV: V-01_НУ/ТУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭ !!= @CODE@ ӈэсь:ӈэ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇЭ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ӇЭ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

!!LEXICON IV_ТО !!the same as IV_ТУ
!!+V+IV: V-01_ТО       ;

LEXICON IV_ТУ
+V+IV: V-01_ТУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ТУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ХО
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ХО       ;

LEXICON IV_ХЭ
+V+IV: V-01_ХЭ       ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_ВАДЮ
+V+IV: V-01_ВАДЮ       ;

LEXICON TV_ВАДЮ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll V-01_ВАДЮ       ;

LEXICON IV_ЯКУ !!= @CODE@ якась:яка
+V+IV: V-01_ЯКУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ
+V+IV: V-01_ИЛЕ	;

LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var !! Work needed for variation 2013-03-04
+V+IV: V-01_ИЛЕ ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ
+V+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL	;

LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var !! Work needed for variation 2013-09-05
+V+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL  ;
+V+Refl: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ИЛЕ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ИЛЕ	;

LEXICON IV_НЕНЫ
+V+IV: V-01_НЕНЫ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭСУ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇЭСУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ӇЭСУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ӇЭСУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ
+V+IV: V-01_ПЭБЮ       ;

LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ПЭБЮ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ПЭБЮ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ПЭБЮ       ;

!LEXICON VR_ПЭБЮ
!+V+Refl: V-01_ПЭБЮ-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ХАДА !!= @CODE@ хадась:хада
+V+IV: V-01_ХАДА       ;

LEXICON pronouns
хибя:хибя PRON-INTERR-HUM_  "kuka" ;
хибяхава:хибяхава PRON_ӇУДИ  "joku" ;
хибяхарт:хибяхарт PRON_ЕД  "ei kukaan" ;
ӈамгэ:ӈа PRON-INTERR_  "mikä" ;
ӈамгэдикы:ӈамгэдикы PRON_ТИКЫ  "jokin" ;
ӈамгэхэва:ӈамгэхэва PRON_ӇУДИ  "jokin" ;
ӈамгэхэрт:ӈамгэхэрт PRON_ЕД  "ei mitään" ;
сямбир:сямбир PRON-INTERR-QNT_  "montako" ;
сян:сян PRON-INTERR-QNT_  "montako" ;
сямян:сямян PRON-INTERR-QNT_  "kaikki" ;
сяхаʼ:сяхаʼ PRON-INTERR-TEMP_  "milloin" ;
тарця:тарця PRON_ПИСЬ  "sellainen" ;
ханзерʼ:ханзерʼ PRON-INTERR-MANNER_  "miten" ;
хурка:хурка PRON-INTERR_ӇУДИ  "millainen" ;
хуркари:хуркари PRON_  "mikä tahansa" ;
хуркахава:хуркахава PRON_ӇУДИ  "jonkinlainen" ;
хуркахарт:хуркахарт PRON_ЕД  "ei minkäänlainen" ;
сиˮми:сиˮми PersSg1-CxAcc  "minua" ;
сит:сит PersSg2-CxAcc  "sinua" ;
сита:сита PersSg3-CxAcc  "häntä" ;
сидниʼ:сидниʼ PersDu1-CxAcc  "meitä (du.)" ;
сиддиʼ:сиддиʼ PersDu2-CxAcc  "teitä (du.)" ;
сиддиʼ:сиддиʼ PersDu3-CxAcc  "heitä (du.)" ;
сиднаˮ:сиднаˮ PersPl1-CxAcc  "meitä (pl.)" ;
сиддаˮ:сиддаˮ PersPl2-CxAcc  "teitä (pl.)" ;
сиддоʼ:сиддоʼ PersPl3-CxAcc  "heitä (pl.)" ;
ханяна:ханяна PRON-INTERR_-CXLOC  "missä" ;
тюкона:тюкона ADV-SPAT_-CXLOC  "täällä" ;
таняна:таняна ADV-SPAT_-CXLOC  "siellä" ;
ханяʼ:ханяʼ PRON-INTERR_-CXLAT  "mihin" ;
хуʼ:хуʼ PRON-INTERR_-CXLAT  "mihin" ;
ханяд:ханяд PRON-INTERR_-CXABL  "mistä" ;
ханяӈы:ханяӈы PRON-INTERR_  "mones" ;
худ:худ PRON-INTERR_-CXABL  "mistä" ;
тюку:тюку PRON-DEM-ADN_  "se" ;
тикы:тикы PRON-DEM-ADN_ТИКЫ  "tämä" ;
такы:такы PRON-DEM-ADN_ТИКЫ  "tämä" ;
сямянхат:сямянхат PRON-DEM-ADN_  "kaikkein" ;
мань:мань PersSg1  "minä (1Sg.)" ;
пыдар:пыдар PersSg2  "sinä (2Sg.)" ;
пыда:пыда PersSg3  "hän" ;
маняˮ:маняˮ PersPl1  "me (1Pl.)" ;
пыдараˮ:пыдараˮ PersPl2  "te (2Pl.)" ;
пыдоʼ:пыдоʼ PersPl3  "he (3Pl.)" ;
маниʼ:маниʼ PersDu1  "me (1Du.)" ;
пыдариʼ:пыдариʼ PersDu2  "te (2Du.)" ;
пыдиʼ:пыдиʼ PersDu3  "he (3Du.)" ;
хариˮ:хареˮ PRON_  "oma" ;
хариˮ:хариˮ PRON_  "oma" ;
хусавэй:хусавэй QNT_ХУСУВЭЙ  "joka" ;
хусувэй:хусувэй QNT_ХУСУВЭЙ  "joka" ;
хуюмʼ:хуюмʼ PRON-INTERR_  "kumpi" ;
LEXICON verbs
вунись:вуни VA_НИ  "eihän…" ;
вэӈгалёсь:вэӈгалё TV_ВАДЮ  "olla venytettynä" ;
епась:епа IV_ПЭБЮ-Pal/Var  "olla kuuma (ilmasta)" ;
есь:е IV_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  "olla kipeä" ;
есь:е IV_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  "paimentaa" ;
илесь:иле IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var  "elää" ;
илесь:иле VR_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var  "selvitä" ;
лядось:лядо IV_ӇЭСУ  "lohkeilla" ;
ляӈголёсь:ляӈголё IV_ВАДЮ  "olla vapaaleikkauksella" ;
мадинесь:мадине IV_ИЛЕ  "pysyä paikallaan" ;
маӈглесь:маӈгле VR_ИЛЕ  "hapata" ;
мись:ми TV_МЭ  "rakentaa" ;
мэсь:мэ IV_МЭ  "olla" ;
мэсь:мэ TV_МЭ  "ottaa" ;
нардесь:нарде TV_ИЛЕ  "poimia" ;
нертюмбась:нертюмба IV_ПЭБЮ  "juosta kilpaa" ;
нись:ни VA_НИ  "ei" ;
нусь:ну IV_НУ  "seistä" ;
нэбёсь:нэбё IV_ӇЭСУ  "olla auki" ;
нэсь:нэсь IV_НУ-Pal/Var  "olla avoinna" ;
нэсь:нэсь TV_НУ-Pal/Var  "avata" ;
нэсь:нэсь VR_НУ-Pal/Var  "avautua" ;
нюмдесь:нюмде VR_ИЛЕ  "saada nimi" ;
нё-:нё VA_НЁ  "älä" ;
пароˮламбась:пароˮламба TV_ПЭБЮ  "omistaa" ;
пинаркась:пинарка IV_ИЛЕ  "pelätä" ;
пулдёсь:пулдё IV_ВАДЮ  "olla kääritty" ;
пэвась:пэва IV_ПЭБЮ-Pal/Var  "olla pimeä" ;
пэсь:пэ VR_НУ-Pal/Var  "alkaa" ;
пюсь:пю TV_ХО  "etsiä" ;
пясь:пя TV_ХО  "alkaa" ;
содыцялмдесь:содыцялмде TV_ИЛЕ  "tehdä kelpaamattomaksi" ;
сось:со IV_НУ/ТУ  "kuulua" ;
сэсеˮларамбась:сэсеˮларамба IV_ПЭБЮ  "olla hädässä" ;
тибтидесь:тибтиде VR_ИЛЕ  "pyrähdellä" ;
тибёсь:тибё IV_ӇЭСУ  "istua" ;
тись:ти IV_НУ-Pal/Var  "istua" ;
тись:ти TV_НУ-Pal/Var  "kammata" ;
тись:ти VR_НУ-Pal/Var  "istuutua" ;
тось:то IV_ТУ  "tulla" ;
тюсь:тю IV_НУ-Pal/Var  "mennä sisään" ;
хабтадембась:хабтадемба TV_ПЭБЮ  "estää hengittämästä" ;
хаерёсь:хаерё IV_ВАДЮ  "helottaa" ;
хась:ха IV_НУ  "kuolla" ;
хось:хо TV_ХО  "löytää" ;
хэсь:хэ IV_ХЭ  "poistua" ;
юльцялебтесь:юльцялебте TV_ИЛЕ  "tehdä kauniisti" ;
ябесь:ябе IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var  "olla juovuksissa" ;
якась:яка IV_ЯКУ  "kihelmöidä" ;
ярмесь:ярме IV_ИЛЕ  "ei tietää" ;
ӈабтесь:ӈабте IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var  "haista" ;
ӈоˮмадяромбась:ӈоˮмэдяромба IV_ПЭБЮ  "hankkia pysyvä rauhallinen paikka" ;
ӈэсь:ӈэ IV_ӇЭ  "sijaita" ;
